Utah statutes.
53B-8d-104.   Notice of tuition waiver approval -- Annual appropriation.
(1)  Upon receiving an application under Section 53B-8d-103, the division
shall determine whether the applicant and the courses for which tuition waiver
is sought meet the requirements of Section 53B-8d-103 and, if so, shall
approve the application and notify the higher education institution that the
application has been approved.
(2)  The division shall provide the necessary forms and applications and
cooperate with the state's institutions of higher education in developing
efficient procedures for the implementation of this chapter.
(3)  The division shall reimburse the state's institutions of higher education
for any tuition waived under this chapter.
(4)  The division shall annually report to the Legislature's Higher Education
Appropriations Subcommittee on the number of individuals for whom tuition has
been waived at each institution and the total amounts reimbursed by the
division under this chapter for the fiscal year.
(5)  The Legislature may annually appropriate the funds necessary to implement
this chapter, including money to offset the reimbursement of tuition waivers.
